Louisiana, session 2026, HB153.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
6 Section 1. R.S. 15:571.11(P) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
7 §571.11. Dispositions of fines and forfeitures
8 * * *
9 P. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, a debt for a
10 fine or conviction fee in criminal cases and prosecutions for violations of state law
11 or parish ordinances, excluding violations of any traffic law found in Title 32 of the
12 Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950 or municipal law, shall not be reported to a credit
13 bureau or consumer reporting agency.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.